Illinois, session 104th, HB5015.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-107)8    Sec. 5. Direct child welfare services; Department of 9Children and Family Services. To provide direct child welfare 10services when not available through other public or private 11child care or program facilities.12    (a) For purposes of this Section:13        (1) "Children" means persons found within the State 14    who are under the age of 18 years. The term also includes 15    persons under age 21 who:16            (A) were committed to the Department pursuant to 17        the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 18        1987 and who continue under the jurisdiction of the 19        court; or20            (B) were accepted for care, service and training 21        by the Department prior to the age of 18 and whose best 22        interest in the discretion of the Department would be 23        served by continuing that care, service and training   HB5015- 2 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        because of severe emotional disturbances, physical 2        disability, social adjustment or any combination 3        thereof, or because of the need to complete an 4        educational or vocational training program.5        (2) "Homeless youth" means persons found within the 6    State who are under the age of 19, are not in a safe and 7    stable living situation and cannot be reunited with their 8    families.9        (3) "Child welfare services" means public social 10    services which are directed toward the accomplishment of 11    the following purposes:12            (A) protecting and promoting the health, safety 13        and welfare of children, including homeless, 14        dependent, or neglected children;15            (B) remedying, or assisting in the solution of 16        problems which may result in, the neglect, abuse, 17        exploitation, or delinquency of children;18            (C) preventing the unnecessary separation of 19        children from their families by identifying family 20        problems, assisting families in resolving their 21        problems, and preventing the breakup of the family 22        where the prevention of child removal is desirable and 23        possible when the child can be cared for at home 24        without endangering the child's health and safety;25            (D) restoring to their families children who have 26        been removed, by the provision of services to the   HB5015- 3 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        child and the families when the child can be cared for 2        at home without endangering the child's health and 3        safety;4            (E) placing children in suitable permanent family 5        arrangements, through guardianship or adoption, in 6        cases where restoration to the birth family is not 7        safe, possible, or appropriate;8            (F) at the time of placement, conducting 9        concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 10        of this Section, so that permanency may occur at the 11        earliest opportunity. Consideration should be given so 12        that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 13        placement made is the best available placement to 14        provide permanency for the child;15            (G) (blank);16            (H) (blank); and17            (I) placing and maintaining children in facilities 18        that provide separate living quarters for children 19        under the age of 18 and for children 18 years of age 20        and older, unless a child 18 years of age is in the 21        last year of high school education or vocational 22        training, in an approved individual or group treatment 23        program, in a licensed shelter facility, or secure 24        child care facility. The Department is not required to 25        place or maintain children:26                (i) who are in a foster home, or  HB5015- 4 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1                (ii) who are persons with a developmental 2            disability, as defined in the Mental Health and 3            Developmental Disabilities Code, or4                (iii) who are female children who are 5            pregnant, pregnant and parenting, or parenting, or6                (iv) who are siblings, in facilities that 7            provide separate living quarters for children 18 8            years of age and older and for children under 18 9            years of age.10    (b) (Blank).11    (b-5) The Department shall adopt rules to establish a 12process for all licensed residential providers in Illinois to 13submit data as required by the Department if they contract or 14receive reimbursement for children's mental health, substance 15use, and developmental disability services from the Department 16of Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 17Department of Healthcare and Family Services. The requested 18data must include, but is not limited to, capacity, staffing, 19and occupancy data for the purpose of establishing State need 20and placement availability. 21    All information collected, shared, or stored pursuant to 22this subsection shall be handled in accordance with all State 23and federal privacy laws and accompanying regulations and 24rules, including, without limitation, the federal Health 25Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public 26Law 104-191) and the Mental Health and Developmental   HB5015- 5 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1Disabilities Confidentiality Act. 2    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain 3tax-supported child welfare services and extend and seek to 4improve voluntary services throughout the State, to the end 5that services and care shall be available on an equal basis 6throughout the State to children requiring such services.7    (d) The Director may authorize advance disbursements for 8any new program initiative to any agency contracting with the 9Department. As a prerequisite for an advance disbursement, the 10contractor must post a surety bond in the amount of the advance 11disbursement and have a purchase of service contract approved 12by the Department. The Department may pay up to 2 months 13operational expenses in advance. The amount of the advance 14disbursement shall be prorated over the life of the contract 15or the remaining months of the fiscal year, whichever is less, 16and the installment amount shall then be deducted from future 17bills. Advance disbursement authorizations for new initiatives 18shall not be made to any agency after that agency has operated 19during 2 consecutive fiscal years. The requirements of this 20Section concerning advance disbursements shall not apply with 21respect to the following: payments to local public agencies 22for child day care services as authorized by Section 5a of this 23Act; and youth service programs receiving grant funds under 24Section 17a-4.25    (e) (Blank).26    (f) (Blank).  HB5015- 6 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    (g) The Department shall establish rules and regulations 2concerning its operation of programs designed to meet the 3goals of child safety and protection, family preservation, and 4permanency, including, but not limited to:5        (1) reunification, guardianship, and adoption;6        (2) relative and licensed foster care;7        (3) family counseling;8        (4) protective services;9        (5) (blank);10        (6) homemaker service;11        (7) return of runaway children;12        (8) (blank);13        (9) placement under Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court 14    Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 4-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile 15    Court Act of 1987 in accordance with the federal Adoption 16    Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980; and17        (10) interstate services.18    Rules and regulations established by the Department shall 19include provisions for training Department staff and the staff 20of Department grantees, through contracts with other agencies 21or resources, in screening techniques to identify substance 22use disorders, as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 23approved by the Department of Human Services, as a successor 24to the Department of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse, for the 25purpose of identifying children and adults who should be 26referred for an assessment at an organization appropriately   HB5015- 7 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1licensed by the Department of Human Services for substance use 2disorder treatment.3    (h) If the Department finds that there is no appropriate 4program or facility within or available to the Department for 5a youth in care and that no licensed private facility has an 6adequate and appropriate program or none agrees to accept the 7youth in care, the Department shall create an appropriate 8individualized, program-oriented plan for such youth in care. 9The plan may be developed within the Department or through 10purchase of services by the Department to the extent that it is 11within its statutory authority to do.12    (i) Service programs shall be available throughout the 13State and shall include but not be limited to the following 14services:15        (1) case management;16        (2) homemakers;17        (3) counseling;18        (4) parent education;19        (5) day care;20        (6) emergency assistance and advocacy; and21        (7) kinship navigator and relative caregiver supports. 22    In addition, the following services may be made available 23to assess and meet the needs of children and families:24        (1) comprehensive family-based services;25        (2) assessments;26        (3) respite care; and  HB5015- 8 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        (4) in-home health services.2    The Department shall provide transportation for any of the 3services it makes available to children or families or for 4which it refers children or families.5    (j) The Department may provide categories of financial 6assistance and education assistance grants, and shall 7establish rules and regulations concerning the assistance and 8grants, to persons who adopt or become subsidized guardians of 9children with physical or mental disabilities, children who 10are older, or other hard-to-place children who (i) immediately 11prior to their adoption or subsidized guardianship were youth 12in care or (ii) were determined eligible for financial 13assistance with respect to a prior adoption and who become 14available for adoption because the prior adoption has been 15dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents have 16been terminated or because the child's adoptive parents have 17died. The Department may continue to provide financial 18assistance and education assistance grants for a child who was 19determined eligible for financial assistance under this 20subsection (j) in the interim period beginning when the 21child's adoptive parents died and ending with the finalization 22of the new adoption of the child by another adoptive parent or 23parents. The Department may also provide categories of 24financial assistance and education assistance grants, and 25shall establish rules and regulations for the assistance and 26grants, to persons appointed guardian of the person under   HB5015- 9 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 24-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for children 3who were youth in care for 12 months immediately prior to the 4appointment of the guardian.5    The amount of assistance may vary, depending upon the 6needs of the child and the adoptive parents or subsidized 7guardians, as set forth in the annual assistance agreement. 8Special purpose grants are allowed where the child requires 9special service but such costs may not exceed the amounts 10which similar services would cost the Department if it were to 11provide or secure them as guardian of the child.12    Any financial assistance provided under this subsection is 13inalienable by assignment, sale, execution, attachment, 14garnishment, or any other remedy for recovery or collection of 15a judgment or debt.16    (j-5) The Department shall not deny or delay the placement 17of a child for adoption if an approved family is available 18either outside of the Department region handling the case, or 19outside of the State of Illinois.20    (k) The Department shall accept for care and training any 21child who has been adjudicated neglected or abused, or 22dependent committed to it pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act 23or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.24    (l) The Department shall offer family preservation 25services, as defined in Section 8.2 of the Abused and 26Neglected Child Reporting Act, to help families, including   HB5015- 10 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1adoptive and extended families. Family preservation services 2shall be offered (i) to prevent the placement of children in 3substitute care when the children can be cared for at home or 4in the custody of the person responsible for the children's 5welfare, (ii) to reunite children with their families, or 6(iii) to maintain an adoption or subsidized guardianship. 7Family preservation services shall only be offered when doing 8so will not endanger the children's health or safety. With 9respect to children who are in substitute care pursuant to the 10Juvenile Court Act of 1987, family preservation services shall 11not be offered if a goal other than those of subdivisions (A), 12(B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) of Section 2-28 of that Act 13has been set, except that reunification services may be 14offered as provided in paragraph (F) of subsection (2.3) of 15Section 2-28 of that Act. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 16construed to create a private right of action or claim on the 17part of any individual or child welfare agency, except that 18when a child is the subject of an action under Article II of 19the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and the child's service plan 20calls for services to facilitate achievement of the permanency 21goal, the court hearing the action under Article II of the 22Juvenile Court Act of 1987 may order the Department to provide 23the services set out in the plan, if those services are not 24provided with reasonable promptness and if those services are 25available.26    The Department shall notify the child and the child's   HB5015- 11 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1family of the Department's responsibility to offer and provide 2family preservation services as identified in the service 3plan. The child and the child's family shall be eligible for 4services as soon as the report is determined to be 5"indicated". The Department may offer services to any child or 6family with respect to whom a report of suspected child abuse 7or neglect has been filed, prior to concluding its 8investigation under Section 7.12 of the Abused and Neglected 9Child Reporting Act. However, the child's or family's 10willingness to accept services shall not be considered in the 11investigation. The Department may also provide services to any 12child or family who is the subject of any report of suspected 13child abuse or neglect or may refer such child or family to 14services available from other agencies in the community, even 15if the report is determined to be unfounded, if the conditions 16in the child's or family's home are reasonably likely to 17subject the child or family to future reports of suspected 18child abuse or neglect. Acceptance of such services shall be 19voluntary. The Department may also provide services to any 20child or family after completion of a family assessment, as an 21alternative to an investigation, as provided under the 22"differential response program" provided for in subsection 23(a-5) of Section 7.4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 24Reporting Act.25    The Department may, at its discretion except for those 26children also adjudicated neglected or dependent, accept for   HB5015- 12 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1care and training any child who has been adjudicated addicted, 2as a truant minor in need of supervision or as a minor 3requiring authoritative intervention, under the Juvenile Court 4Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, but no such child shall 5be committed to the Department by any court without the 6approval of the Department. On and after January 1, 2015 (the 7effective date of Public Act 98-803) and before January 1, 82017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 9Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 10adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 11or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 12less than 16 years of age committed to the Department under 13Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 14for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 15exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 16minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 17to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 182-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. On and after January 1, 192017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 20Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 21adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 22or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 23less than 15 years of age committed to the Department under 24Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 25for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 26exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a   HB5015- 13 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 2to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 32-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. An independent basis 4exists when the allegations or adjudication of abuse, neglect, 5or dependency do not arise from the same facts, incident, or 6circumstances which give rise to a charge or adjudication of 7delinquency. The Department shall assign a caseworker to 8attend any hearing involving a youth in the care and custody of 9the Department who is placed on aftercare release, including 10hearings involving sanctions for violation of aftercare 11release conditions and aftercare release revocation hearings. 12    As soon as is possible, the Department shall develop and 13implement a special program of family preservation services to 14support intact, relative, foster, and adoptive families who 15are experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 16stress of caring for a child who has been diagnosed with a 17pervasive developmental disorder if the Department determines 18that those services are necessary to ensure the health and 19safety of the child. The Department may offer services to any 20family whether or not a report has been filed under the Abused 21and Neglected Child Reporting Act. The Department may refer 22the child or family to services available from other agencies 23in the community if the conditions in the child's or family's 24home are reasonably likely to subject the child or family to 25future reports of suspected child abuse or neglect. Acceptance 26of these services shall be voluntary. The Department shall   HB5015- 14 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1develop and implement a public information campaign to alert 2health and social service providers and the general public 3about these special family preservation services. The nature 4and scope of the services offered and the number of families 5served under the special program implemented under this 6paragraph shall be determined by the level of funding that the 7Department annually allocates for this purpose. The term 8"pervasive developmental disorder" under this paragraph means 9a neurological condition, including, but not limited to, 10Asperger's Syndrome and autism, as defined in the most recent 11edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 12Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.13    (l-1) The General Assembly recognizes that the best 14interests of the child require that the child be placed in the 15most permanent living arrangement that is an appropriate 16option for the child, consistent with the child's best 17interest, using the factors set forth in subsection (4.05) of 18Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 as soon as is 19practically possible. To achieve this goal, the General 20Assembly directs the Department of Children and Family 21Services to conduct concurrent planning so that permanency may 22occur at the earliest opportunity. Permanent living 23arrangements may include prevention of placement of a child 24outside the home of the family when the child can be cared for 25at home without endangering the child's health or safety; 26reunification with the family, when safe and appropriate, if   HB5015- 15 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1temporary placement is necessary; or movement of the child 2toward the most appropriate living arrangement and legal 3status.4    When determining reasonable efforts to be made with 5respect to a child, as described in this subsection, and in 6making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety 7shall be the paramount concern.8    When a child is placed in foster care, the Department 9shall ensure and document that reasonable efforts were made to 10prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the 11child's home. The Department must make reasonable efforts to 12reunify the family when temporary placement of the child 13occurs unless otherwise required, pursuant to the Juvenile 14Court Act of 1987. At any time after the dispositional hearing 15where the Department believes that further reunification 16services would be ineffective, it may request a finding from 17the court that reasonable efforts are no longer appropriate. 18The Department is not required to provide further 19reunification services after such a finding.20    A decision to place a child in substitute care shall be 21made with considerations of the child's health, safety, and 22best interests. The Department shall make diligent efforts to 23place the child with a relative, document those diligent 24efforts, and document reasons for any failure or inability to 25secure such a relative placement. If the primary issue 26preventing an emergency placement of a child with a relative   HB5015- 16 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1is a lack of resources, including, but not limited to, 2concrete goods, safety modifications, and services, the 3Department shall make diligent efforts to assist the relative 4in obtaining the necessary resources. No later than July 1, 52025, the Department shall adopt rules defining what is 6diligent and necessary in providing supports to potential 7relative placements. At the time of placement, consideration 8should also be given so that if reunification fails or is 9delayed, the placement has the potential to be an appropriate 10permanent placement for the child.11    The Department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent 12planning for reunification and permanency. The Department 13shall consider the following factors when determining 14appropriateness of concurrent planning:15        (1) the likelihood of prompt reunification;16        (2) the past history of the family;17        (3) the barriers to reunification being addressed by 18    the family;19        (4) the level of cooperation of the family;20        (4.5) the child's wishes; 21        (5) the caregivers' willingness to work with the 22    family to reunite;23        (6) the willingness and ability of the caregivers' to 24    provide a permanent placement;25        (7) the age of the child;26        (8) placement of siblings; and  HB5015- 17 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        (9) the wishes of the parent or parents unless the 2    parental preferences are contrary to the best interests of 3    the child. 4    (m) The Department may assume temporary custody of any 5child if:6        (1) it has received a written consent to such 7    temporary custody signed by the parents of the child or by 8    the parent having custody of the child if the parents are 9    not living together or by the guardian or custodian of the 10    child if the child is not in the custody of either parent, 11    or12        (2) the child is found in the State and neither a 13    parent, guardian nor custodian of the child can be 14    located.15If the child is found in the child's residence without a 16parent, guardian, custodian, or responsible caretaker, the 17Department may, instead of removing the child and assuming 18temporary custody, place an authorized representative of the 19Department in that residence until such time as a parent, 20guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses a 21willingness and apparent ability to ensure the child's health 22and safety and resume permanent charge of the child, or until a 23relative enters the home and is willing and able to ensure the 24child's health and safety and assume charge of the child until 25a parent, guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses 26such willingness and ability to ensure the child's safety and   HB5015- 18 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1resume permanent charge. After a caretaker has remained in the 2home for a period not to exceed 12 hours, the Department must 3follow those procedures outlined in Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 45-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.5    The Department shall have the authority, responsibilities 6and duties that a legal custodian of the child would have 7pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 8Court Act of 1987. Whenever a child is taken into temporary 9custody pursuant to an investigation under the Abused and 10Neglected Child Reporting Act, or pursuant to a referral and 11acceptance under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of a minor in 12limited custody, the Department, during the period of 13temporary custody and before the child is brought before a 14judicial officer as required by Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 155-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall have the 16authority, responsibilities and duties that a legal custodian 17of the child would have under subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of 18the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.19    The Department shall ensure that any child taken into 20custody is scheduled for an appointment for a medical 21examination.22    A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the 23temporary custody of the Department who would have custody of 24the child if the child were not in the temporary custody of the 25Department may deliver to the Department a signed request that 26the Department surrender the temporary custody of the child.   HB5015- 19 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1The Department may retain temporary custody of the child for 210 days after the receipt of the request, during which period 3the Department may cause to be filed a petition pursuant to the 4Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If a petition is so filed, the 5Department shall retain temporary custody of the child until 6the court orders otherwise. If a petition is not filed within 7the 10-day period, the child shall be surrendered to the 8custody of the requesting parent, guardian, or custodian not 9later than the expiration of the 10-day period, at which time 10the authority and duties of the Department with respect to the 11temporary custody of the child shall terminate.12    (m-1) The Department may place children under 18 years of 13age in a secure child care facility licensed by the Department 14that cares for children who are in need of secure living 15arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being after a 16determination is made by the facility director and the 17Director or the Director's designate prior to admission to the 18facility subject to Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act 19of 1987. This subsection (m-1) does not apply to a child who is 20subject to placement in a correctional facility operated 21pursuant to Section 3-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, 22unless the child is a youth in care who was placed in the care 23of the Department before being subject to placement in a 24correctional facility and a court of competent jurisdiction 25has ordered placement of the child in a secure care facility.26    (n) The Department may place children under 18 years of   HB5015- 20 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1age in licensed child care facilities when in the opinion of 2the Department, appropriate services aimed at family 3preservation have been unsuccessful and cannot ensure the 4child's health and safety or are unavailable and such 5placement would be for their best interest. Payment for board, 6clothing, care, training and supervision of any child placed 7in a licensed child care facility may be made by the 8Department, by the parents or guardians of the estates of 9those children, or by both the Department and the parents or 10guardians, except that no payments shall be made by the 11Department for any child placed in a licensed child care 12facility for board, clothing, care, training, and supervision 13of such a child that exceed the average per capita cost of 14maintaining and of caring for a child in institutions for 15dependent or neglected children operated by the Department. 16However, such restriction on payments does not apply in cases 17where children require specialized care and treatment for 18problems of severe emotional disturbance, physical disability, 19social adjustment, or any combination thereof and suitable 20facilities for the placement of such children are not 21available at payment rates within the limitations set forth in 22this Section. All reimbursements for services delivered shall 23be absolutely inalienable by assignment, sale, attachment, or 24garnishment or otherwise.25    (n-1) The Department shall provide or authorize child 26welfare services, aimed at assisting minors to achieve   HB5015- 21 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1sustainable self-sufficiency as independent adults, for any 2minor eligible for the reinstatement of wardship pursuant to 3subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 41987, whether or not such reinstatement is sought or allowed, 5provided that the minor consents to such services and has not 6yet attained the age of 21. The Department shall have 7responsibility for the development and delivery of services 8under this Section. An eligible youth may access services 9under this Section through the Department of Children and 10Family Services or by referral from the Department of Human 11Services. Youth participating in services under this Section 12shall cooperate with the assigned case manager in developing 13an agreement identifying the services to be provided and how 14the youth will increase skills to achieve self-sufficiency. A 15homeless shelter is not considered appropriate housing for any 16youth receiving child welfare services under this Section. The 17Department shall continue child welfare services under this 18Section to any eligible minor until the minor becomes 21 years 19of age, no longer consents to participate, or achieves 20self-sufficiency as identified in the minor's service plan. 21The Department of Children and Family Services shall create 22clear, readable notice of the rights of former foster youth to 23child welfare services under this Section and how such 24services may be obtained. The Department of Children and 25Family Services and the Department of Human Services shall 26disseminate this information statewide. The Department shall   HB5015- 22 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1adopt regulations describing services intended to assist 2minors in achieving sustainable self-sufficiency as 3independent adults. 4    (o) The Department shall establish an administrative 5review and appeal process for children and families who 6request or receive child welfare services from the Department. 7Youth in care who are placed by private child welfare 8agencies, and caregivers with whom those youth are placed, 9shall be afforded the same procedural and appeal rights as 10children and families in the case of placement by the 11Department, including the right to an initial review of a 12private agency decision by that agency. The Department shall 13ensure that any private child welfare agency, which accepts 14youth in care for placement, affords those rights to children 15and caregivers with whom those children are placed. The 16Department shall accept for administrative review and an 17appeal hearing a complaint made by (i) a child or caregiver 18with whom the child is placed concerning a decision following 19an initial review by a private child welfare agency or (ii) a 20prospective adoptive parent who alleges a violation of 21subsection (j-5) of this Section. An appeal of a decision 22concerning a change in the placement of a child shall be 23conducted in an expedited manner. A court determination that a 24current placement is necessary and appropriate under Section 252-28 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 does not constitute a 26judicial determination on the merits of an administrative   HB5015- 23 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1appeal, filed by a former caregiver, involving a change of 2placement decision. No later than July 1, 2025, the Department 3shall adopt rules to develop a reconsideration process to 4review: a denial of certification of a relative, a denial of 5placement with a relative, and a denial of visitation with an 6identified relative. Rules shall include standards and 7criteria for reconsideration that incorporate the best 8interests of the child under subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 9of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, address situations where 10multiple relatives seek certification, and provide that all 11rules regarding placement changes shall be followed. The rules 12shall outline the essential elements of each form used in the 13implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this 14amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 15    (p) (Blank).16    (q) The Department may receive and use, in their entirety, 17for the benefit of children any gift, donation, or bequest of 18money or other property which is received on behalf of such 19children, or any financial benefits to which such children are 20or may become entitled while under the jurisdiction or care of 21the Department, except that the benefits described in Section 225.46 must be used and conserved consistent with the provisions 23under Section 5.46.24    The Department shall set up and administer no-cost, 25interest-bearing accounts in appropriate financial 26institutions for children for whom the Department is legally   HB5015- 24 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1responsible and who have been determined eligible for 2Veterans' Benefits, Social Security benefits, assistance 3allotments from the armed forces, court ordered payments, 4parental voluntary payments, Supplemental Security Income, 5Railroad Retirement payments, Black Lung benefits, or other 6miscellaneous payments. Interest earned by each account shall 7be credited to the account, unless disbursed in accordance 8with this subsection.9    In disbursing funds from children's accounts, the 10Department shall:11        (1) Establish standards in accordance with State and 12    federal laws for disbursing money from children's 13    accounts. In all circumstances, the Department's 14    Guardianship Administrator or the Guardianship 15    Administrator's designee must approve disbursements from 16    children's accounts. The Department shall be responsible 17    for keeping complete records of all disbursements for each 18    account for any purpose.19        (2) Calculate on a monthly basis the amounts paid from 20    State funds for the child's board and care, medical care 21    not covered under Medicaid, and social services; and 22    utilize funds from the child's account, as covered by 23    regulation, to reimburse those costs. Monthly, 24    disbursements from all children's accounts, up to 1/12 of 25    $13,000,000, shall be deposited by the Department into the 26    General Revenue Fund and the balance over 1/12 of   HB5015- 25 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    $13,000,000 into the DCFS Children's Services Fund.2        (3) Maintain any balance remaining after reimbursing 3    for the child's costs of care, as specified in item (2). 4    The balance shall accumulate in accordance with relevant 5    State and federal laws and shall be disbursed to the child 6    or the child's guardian or to the issuing agency.7    (r) The Department shall promulgate regulations 8encouraging all adoption agencies to voluntarily forward to 9the Department or its agent names and addresses of all persons 10who have applied for and have been approved for adoption of a 11hard-to-place child or child with a disability and the names 12of such children who have not been placed for adoption. A list 13of such names and addresses shall be maintained by the 14Department or its agent, and coded lists which maintain the 15confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 16of the child shall be made available, without charge, to every 17adoption agency in the State to assist the agencies in placing 18such children for adoption. The Department may delegate to an 19agent its duty to maintain and make available such lists. The 20Department shall ensure that such agent maintains the 21confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 22of the child.23    (s) The Department of Children and Family Services may 24establish and implement a program to reimburse caregivers 25licensed, certified, or otherwise approved by the Department 26of Children and Family Services for damages sustained by the   HB5015- 26 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1caregivers as a result of the malicious or negligent acts of 2children placed by the Department, as well as providing third 3party coverage for such caregivers with regard to actions of 4children placed by the Department to other individuals. Such 5coverage will be secondary to the caregiver's liability 6insurance policy, if applicable. The program shall be funded 7through appropriations from the General Revenue Fund, 8specifically designated for such purposes.9    (t) The Department shall perform home studies and 10investigations and shall exercise supervision over visitation 11as ordered by a court pursuant to the Illinois Marriage and 12Dissolution of Marriage Act or the Adoption Act only if:13        (1) an order entered by an Illinois court specifically 14    directs the Department to perform such services; and15        (2) the court has ordered one or both of the parties to 16    the proceeding to reimburse the Department for its 17    reasonable costs for providing such services in accordance 18    with Department rules, or has determined that neither 19    party is financially able to pay.20    The Department shall provide written notification to the 21court of the specific arrangements for supervised visitation 22and projected monthly costs within 60 days of the court order. 23The Department shall send to the court information related to 24the costs incurred except in cases where the court has 25determined the parties are financially unable to pay. The 26court may order additional periodic reports as appropriate.  HB5015- 27 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    (u) In addition to other information that must be 2provided, whenever the Department places a child with a 3prospective adoptive parent or parents, in a licensed foster 4home, group home, or child care institution, in a relative 5home, or in a certified relative caregiver home, the 6Department shall provide to the caregiver, appropriate 7facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or parents:8        (1) available detailed information concerning the 9    child's educational and health history, copies of 10    immunization records (including insurance and medical card 11    information), a history of the child's previous 12    placements, if any, and reasons for placement changes 13    excluding any information that identifies or reveals the 14    location of any previous caregiver or adoptive parents;15        (2) a copy of the child's portion of the client 16    service plan, including any visitation arrangement, and 17    all amendments or revisions to it as related to the child; 18    and19        (3) information containing details of the child's 20    individualized education program educational plan when the 21    child is receiving special education services.22    The caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective 23adoptive parent or parents, shall be informed of any known 24social or behavioral information (including, but not limited 25to, criminal background, fire setting, perpetuation of sexual 26abuse, destructive behavior, and substance abuse) necessary to   HB5015- 28 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1care for and safeguard the children to be placed or currently 2in the home or setting. The Department may prepare a written 3summary of the information required by this paragraph, which 4may be provided to the caregiver, appropriate facility staff, 5or prospective adoptive parent in advance of a placement. The 6caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive 7parent may review the supporting documents in the child's file 8in the presence of casework staff. In the case of an emergency 9placement, casework staff shall at least provide known 10information verbally, if necessary, and must subsequently 11provide the information in writing as required by this 12subsection. 13    The information described in this subsection shall be 14provided in writing. In the case of emergency placements when 15time does not allow prior review, preparation, and collection 16of written information, the Department shall provide such 17information as it becomes available. Within 10 business days 18after placement, the Department shall obtain from the 19caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive 20parent or parents a signed verification of receipt of the 21information provided. Within 10 business days after placement, 22the Department shall provide to the child's guardian ad litem 23a copy of the information provided to the caregiver, 24appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or 25parents. The information provided to the caregiver, 26appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or   HB5015- 29 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1parents shall be reviewed and approved regarding accuracy at 2the supervisory level. 3    (u-5) Beginning July 1, 2025, certified relative caregiver 4homes under Section 3.4 of the Child Care Act of 1969 shall be 5eligible to receive foster care maintenance payments from the 6Department in an amount no less than payments made to licensed 7foster family homes. Beginning July 1, 2025, relative homes 8providing care to a child placed by the Department that are not 9a certified relative caregiver home under Section 3.4 of the 10Child Care Act of 1969 or a licensed foster family home shall 11be eligible to receive payments from the Department in an 12amount no less 90% of the payments made to licensed foster 13family homes and certified relative caregiver homes.14    (u-6) To assist relative and certified relative 15caregivers, no later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall 16adopt rules to implement a relative support program, as 17follows: 18        (1) For relative and certified relative caregivers, 19    the Department is authorized to reimburse or prepay 20    reasonable expenditures to remedy home conditions 21    necessary to fulfill the home safety-related requirements 22    of relative caregiver homes. 23        (2) The Department may provide short-term emergency 24    funds to relative and certified relative caregiver homes 25    experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 26    stress associated with adding youth in care as new   HB5015- 30 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    household members. 2        (3) Consistent with federal law, the Department shall 3    include in any State Plan made in accordance with the 4    Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Titles 5    IV-E and XIX of the Social Security Act, and any other 6    applicable federal laws the provision of kinship navigator 7    program services. The Department shall apply for and 8    administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with 9    law. Federal funds acquired for the kinship navigator 10    program shall be used for the development, implementation, 11    and operation of kinship navigator program services. The 12    kinship navigator program services may provide 13    information, referral services, support, and assistance to 14    relative and certified relative caregivers of youth in 15    care to address their unique needs and challenges. Until 16    the Department is approved to receive federal funds for 17    these purposes, the Department shall publicly post on the 18    Department's website semi-annual updates regarding the 19    Department's progress in pursuing federal funding. 20    Whenever the Department publicly posts these updates on 21    its website, the Department shall notify the General 22    Assembly through the General Assembly's designee. 23    (u-7) To support finding permanency for children through 24subsidized guardianship and adoption and to prevent disruption 25in guardianship and adoptive placements, the Department shall 26establish and maintain accessible subsidized guardianship and   HB5015- 31 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1adoption support services for all children under 18 years of 2age placed in guardianship or adoption who, immediately 3preceding the guardianship or adoption, were in the custody or 4guardianship of the Department under Article II of the 5Juvenile Court Act of 1987.6    The Department shall establish and maintain a toll-free 7number to respond to requests from the public about its 8subsidized guardianship and adoption support services under 9this subsection and shall staff the toll-free number so that 10calls are answered on a timely basis, but in no event more than 11one business day after the receipt of a request. These 12requests from the public may be made anonymously. To meet this 13obligation, the Department may utilize the same toll-free 14number the Department operates to respond to post-adoption 15requests under subsection (b-5) of Section 18.9 of the 16Adoption Act. The Department shall publicize information about 17the Department's subsidized guardianship support services and 18toll-free number as follows:19        (1) it shall post information on the Department's 20    website;21        (2) it shall provide the information to every licensed 22    child welfare agency and any entity providing subsidized 23    guardianship support services in Illinois courts;24        (3) it shall reference such information in the 25    materials the Department provides to caregivers pursuing 26    subsidized guardianship to inform them of their rights and   HB5015- 32 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    responsibilities under the Child Care Act of 1969 and this 2    Act;3        (4) it shall provide the information, including the 4    Department's Post Adoption and Guardianship Services 5    booklet, to eligible caregivers as part of its 6    guardianship training and at the time they are presented 7    with the Permanency Commitment form;8        (5) it shall include, in each annual notification 9    letter mailed to subsidized guardians, a short, 2-sided 10    flier or news bulletin in plain language that describes 11    access to post-guardianship services, how to access 12    services under the Family Support Program, formerly known 13    as the Individual Care Grant Program, the webpage address 14    to the Post Adoption and Guardianship Services booklet, 15    information on how to request that a copy of the booklet be 16    mailed; and17        (6) it shall ensure that kinship navigator programs of 18    this State, when established, have this information to 19    include in materials the programs provide to caregivers.20    No later than July 1, 2026, the Department shall provide a 21mechanism for the public to make information requests by 22electronic means. 23    The Department shall review and update annually all 24information relating to its subsidized guardianship support 25services, including its Post Adoption and Guardianship 26Services booklet, to include updated information on Family   HB5015- 33 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1Support Program services eligibility and subsidized 2guardianship support services that are available through the 3medical assistance program established under Article V of the 4Illinois Public Aid Code or any other State program for mental 5health services. The Department and the Department of 6Healthcare and Family Services shall coordinate their efforts 7in the development of these resources.8    Every licensed child welfare agency and any entity 9providing kinship navigator programs funded by the Department 10shall provide the Department's website address and link to the 11Department's subsidized guardianship support services 12information set forth in subsection (d), including the 13Department's toll-free number, to every relative who is or 14will be providing guardianship placement for a child placed by 15the Department.16    (v) The Department shall access criminal history record 17information as defined in the Illinois Uniform Conviction 18Information Act and information maintained in the adjudicatory 19and dispositional record system as defined in Section 2605-355 20of the Illinois State Police Law if the Department determines 21the information is necessary to perform its duties under the 22Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, the Child Care Act 23of 1969, and the Children and Family Services Act. The 24Department shall provide for interactive computerized 25communication and processing equipment that permits direct 26online on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's   HB5015- 34 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1central criminal history data repository. The Department shall 2comply with all certification requirements and provide 3certified operators who have been trained by personnel from 4the Illinois State Police. In addition, one Office of the 5Inspector General investigator shall have training in the use 6of the criminal history information access system and have 7access to the terminal. The Department of Children and Family 8Services and its employees shall abide by rules and 9regulations established by the Illinois State Police relating 10to the access and dissemination of this information.11    (v-1) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 12with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall conduct 13a criminal records background check of the prospective foster 14or adoptive parent, including fingerprint-based checks of 15national crime information databases. Final approval for 16placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals a 17felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for spousal 18abuse, for a crime against children, or for a crime involving 19violence, including human trafficking, sex trafficking, rape, 20sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical 21assault or battery, or if there is a felony conviction for 22physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense committed 23within the past 5 years.24    (v-2) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 25with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall check 26its child abuse and neglect registry for information   HB5015- 35 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1concerning prospective foster and adoptive parents, and any 2adult living in the home. If any prospective foster or 3adoptive parent or other adult living in the home has resided 4in another state in the preceding 5 years, the Department 5shall request a check of that other state's child abuse and 6neglect registry. 7    (v-3) Prior to the final approval of final placement of a 8related child in a certified relative caregiver home as 9defined in Section 2.37 of the Child Care Act of 1969, the 10Department shall ensure that the background screening meets 11the standards required under subsection (c) of Section 3.4 of 12the Child Care Act of 1969. 13    (v-4) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 14with a relative, as defined in Section 4d of this Act, who is 15not a licensed foster parent, has declined to seek approval to 16be a certified relative caregiver, or was denied approval as a 17certified relative caregiver, the Department shall: 18        (i) check the child abuse and neglect registry for 19    information concerning the prospective relative caregiver 20    and any other adult living in the home. If any prospective 21    relative caregiver or other adult living in the home has 22    resided in another state in the preceding 5 years, the 23    Department shall request a check of that other state's 24    child abuse and neglect registry; and 25        (ii) conduct a criminal records background check of 26    the prospective relative caregiver and all other adults   HB5015- 36 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    living in the home, including fingerprint-based checks of 2    national crime information databases. Final approval for 3    placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals 4    a felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for 5    spousal abuse, for a crime against children, or for a 6    crime involving violence, including human trafficking, sex 7    trafficking, rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not 8    including other physical assault or battery, or if there 9    is a felony conviction for physical assault, battery, or a 10    drug-related offense committed within the past 5 years; 11    provided however, that the Department is empowered to 12    grant a waiver as the Department may provide by rule, and 13    the Department approves the request for the waiver based 14    on a comprehensive evaluation of the caregiver and 15    household members and the conditions relating to the 16    safety of the placement.17    No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt 18rules or revise existing rules to effectuate the changes made 19to this subsection (v-4). The rules shall outline the 20essential elements of each form used in the implementation and 21enforcement of the provisions of this amendatory Act of the 22103rd General Assembly. 23    (w) (Blank).24    (x) The Department shall conduct annual credit history 25checks to determine the financial history of children placed 26under its guardianship pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of   HB5015- 37 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b11987. The Department shall conduct such credit checks starting 2when a youth in care turns 12 years old and each year 3thereafter for the duration of the guardianship as terminated 4pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Department 5shall determine if financial exploitation of the child's 6personal information has occurred. If financial exploitation 7appears to have taken place or is presently ongoing, the 8Department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency, the 9proper State's Attorney, or the Attorney General.10    (y) Beginning on July 22, 2010 (the effective date of 11Public Act 96-1189), a child with a disability who receives 12residential and educational services from the Department shall 13be eligible to receive transition services in accordance with 14Article 14 of the School Code from the age of 14.5 through age 1521, inclusive, notwithstanding the child's residential 16services arrangement. For purposes of this subsection, "child 17with a disability" means a child with a disability as defined 18by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 19Improvement Act of 2004. 20    (z) The Department shall access criminal history record 21information as defined as "background information" in this 22subsection and criminal history record information as defined 23in the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act for each 24Department employee or Department applicant. Each Department 25employee or Department applicant shall submit the employee's 26or applicant's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in   HB5015- 38 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 2These fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint 3records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police 4and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 5records databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a 6fee for conducting the criminal history record check, which 7shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and 8shall not exceed the actual cost of the record check. The 9Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 10identification, all Illinois conviction information to the 11Department of Children and Family Services. 12    For purposes of this subsection: 13    "Background information" means all of the following: 14        (i) Upon the request of the Department of Children and 15    Family Services, conviction information obtained from the 16    Illinois State Police as a result of a fingerprint-based 17    criminal history records check of the Illinois criminal 18    history records database and the Federal Bureau of 19    Investigation criminal history records database concerning 20    a Department employee or Department applicant. 21        (ii) Information obtained by the Department of 22    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 23    the Illinois State Police's Sex Offender Database, as 24    authorized by Section 120 of the Sex Offender Community 25    Notification Law, concerning a Department employee or 26    Department applicant.   HB5015- 39 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        (iii) Information obtained by the Department of 2    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 3    the Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 4    operated and maintained by the Department. 5    "Department employee" means a full-time or temporary 6employee coded or certified within the State of Illinois 7Personnel System. 8    "Department applicant" means an individual who has 9conditional Department full-time or part-time work, a 10contractor, an individual used to replace or supplement staff, 11an academic intern, a volunteer in Department offices or on 12Department contracts, a work-study student, an individual or 13entity licensed by the Department, or an unlicensed service 14provider who works as a condition of a contract or an agreement 15and whose work may bring the unlicensed service provider into 16contact with Department clients or client records. 17    (aa) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 18104-165 this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are 19declarative of existing law and are not a new enactment. 20(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-50, eff. 1-1-24; 21103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, eff. 227-1-25; 104-165, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-11-25.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-107)24    Sec. 5. Direct child welfare services; Department of 25Children and Family Services. To provide direct child welfare   HB5015- 40 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1services when not available through other public or private 2child care or program facilities.3    (a) For purposes of this Section:4        (1) "Children" means persons found within the State 5    who are under the age of 18 years. The term also includes 6    persons under age 21 who:7            (A) were committed to the Department pursuant to 8        the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 9        1987 and who continue under the jurisdiction of the 10        court; or11            (B) were accepted for care, service and training 12        by the Department prior to the age of 18 and whose best 13        interest in the discretion of the Department would be 14        served by continuing that care, service and training 15        because of severe emotional disturbances, physical 16        disability, social adjustment or any combination 17        thereof, or because of the need to complete an 18        educational or vocational training program.19        (2) "Homeless youth" means persons found within the 20    State who are under the age of 19, are not in a safe and 21    stable living situation and cannot be reunited with their 22    families.23        (3) "Child welfare services" means public social 24    services which are directed toward the accomplishment of 25    the following purposes:26            (A) protecting and promoting the health, safety   HB5015- 41 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        and welfare of children, including homeless, 2        dependent, or neglected children;3            (B) remedying, or assisting in the solution of 4        problems which may result in, the neglect, abuse, 5        exploitation, or delinquency of children;6            (C) preventing the unnecessary separation of 7        children from their families by identifying family 8        problems, assisting families in resolving their 9        problems, and preventing the breakup of the family 10        where the prevention of child removal is desirable and 11        possible when the child can be cared for at home 12        without endangering the child's health and safety;13            (D) restoring to their families children who have 14        been removed, by the provision of services to the 15        child and the families when the child can be cared for 16        at home without endangering the child's health and 17        safety;18            (E) placing children in suitable permanent family 19        arrangements, through guardianship or adoption, in 20        cases where restoration to the birth family is not 21        safe, possible, or appropriate;22            (F) at the time of placement, conducting 23        concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 24        of this Section, so that permanency may occur at the 25        earliest opportunity. Consideration should be given so 26        that if reunification fails or is delayed, the   HB5015- 42 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        placement made is the best available placement to 2        provide permanency for the child;3            (F-1) preparing adolescents to successfully 4        transition to independence, including transition 5        planning for youth who qualify for a guardian as a 6        person with a disability under Article XIa of the 7        Probate Act of 1975; 8            (G) (blank);9            (H) (blank); and10            (I) placing and maintaining children in facilities 11        that provide separate living quarters for children 12        under the age of 18 and for children 18 years of age 13        and older, unless a child 18 years of age is in the 14        last year of high school education or vocational 15        training, in an approved individual or group treatment 16        program, in a licensed shelter facility, or secure 17        child care facility. The Department is not required to 18        place or maintain children:19                (i) who are in a foster home, or20                (ii) who are persons with a developmental 21            disability, as defined in the Mental Health and 22            Developmental Disabilities Code, or23                (iii) who are female children who are 24            pregnant, pregnant and parenting, or parenting, or25                (iv) who are siblings, in facilities that 26            provide separate living quarters for children 18   HB5015- 43 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1            years of age and older and for children under 18 2            years of age.3    (b) (Blank).4    (b-5) The Department shall adopt rules to establish a 5process for all licensed residential providers in Illinois to 6submit data as required by the Department if they contract or 7receive reimbursement for children's mental health, substance 8use, and developmental disability services from the Department 9of Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 10Department of Healthcare and Family Services. The requested 11data must include, but is not limited to, capacity, staffing, 12and occupancy data for the purpose of establishing State need 13and placement availability. 14    All information collected, shared, or stored pursuant to 15this subsection shall be handled in accordance with all State 16and federal privacy laws and accompanying regulations and 17rules, including, without limitation, the federal Health 18Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public 19Law 104-191) and the Mental Health and Developmental 20Disabilities Confidentiality Act. 21    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain 22tax-supported child welfare services and extend and seek to 23improve voluntary services throughout the State, to the end 24that services and care shall be available on an equal basis 25throughout the State to children requiring such services.26    (d) The Director may authorize advance disbursements for   HB5015- 44 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1any new program initiative to any agency contracting with the 2Department. As a prerequisite for an advance disbursement, the 3contractor must post a surety bond in the amount of the advance 4disbursement and have a purchase of service contract approved 5by the Department. The Department may pay up to 2 months 6operational expenses in advance. The amount of the advance 7disbursement shall be prorated over the life of the contract 8or the remaining months of the fiscal year, whichever is less, 9and the installment amount shall then be deducted from future 10bills. Advance disbursement authorizations for new initiatives 11shall not be made to any agency after that agency has operated 12during 2 consecutive fiscal years. The requirements of this 13Section concerning advance disbursements shall not apply with 14respect to the following: payments to local public agencies 15for child day care services as authorized by Section 5a of this 16Act; and youth service programs receiving grant funds under 17Section 17a-4.18    (e) (Blank).19    (f) (Blank).20    (g) The Department shall establish rules and regulations 21concerning its operation of programs designed to meet the 22goals of child safety and protection, family preservation, and 23permanency, including, but not limited to:24        (1) reunification, guardianship, and adoption;25        (2) relative and licensed foster care;26        (3) family counseling;  HB5015- 45 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        (4) protective services;2        (5) (blank);3        (6) homemaker service;4        (7) return of runaway children;5        (8) (blank);6        (9) placement under Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court 7    Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 4-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile 8    Court Act of 1987 in accordance with the federal Adoption 9    Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980; 10        (10) interstate services; and11        (11) transition planning for youth aging out of care. 12    Rules and regulations established by the Department shall 13include provisions for training Department staff and the staff 14of Department grantees, through contracts with other agencies 15or resources, in screening techniques to identify substance 16use disorders, as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 17approved by the Department of Human Services, as a successor 18to the Department of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse, for the 19purpose of identifying children and adults who should be 20referred for an assessment at an organization appropriately 21licensed by the Department of Human Services for substance use 22disorder treatment.23    (h) If the Department finds that there is no appropriate 24program or facility within or available to the Department for 25a youth in care and that no licensed private facility has an 26adequate and appropriate program or none agrees to accept the   HB5015- 46 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1youth in care, the Department shall create an appropriate 2individualized, program-oriented plan for such youth in care. 3The plan may be developed within the Department or through 4purchase of services by the Department to the extent that it is 5within its statutory authority to do.6    (i) Service programs shall be available throughout the 7State and shall include but not be limited to the following 8services:9        (1) case management;10        (2) homemakers;11        (3) counseling;12        (4) parent education;13        (5) day care;14        (6) emergency assistance and advocacy; and15        (7) kinship navigator and relative caregiver supports. 16    In addition, the following services may be made available 17to assess and meet the needs of children and families:18        (1) comprehensive family-based services;19        (2) assessments;20        (3) respite care; and21        (4) in-home health services.22    The Department shall provide transportation for any of the 23services it makes available to children or families or for 24which it refers children or families.25    (j) The Department may provide categories of financial 26assistance and education assistance grants, and shall   HB5015- 47 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1establish rules and regulations concerning the assistance and 2grants, to persons who adopt or become subsidized guardians of 3children with physical or mental disabilities, children who 4are older, or other hard-to-place children who (i) immediately 5prior to their adoption or subsidized guardianship were youth 6in care or (ii) were determined eligible for financial 7assistance with respect to a prior adoption and who become 8available for adoption because the prior adoption has been 9dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents have 10been terminated or because the child's adoptive parents have 11died. The Department may continue to provide financial 12assistance and education assistance grants for a child who was 13determined eligible for financial assistance under this 14subsection (j) in the interim period beginning when the 15child's adoptive parents died and ending with the finalization 16of the new adoption of the child by another adoptive parent or 17parents. The Department may also provide categories of 18financial assistance and education assistance grants, and 19shall establish rules and regulations for the assistance and 20grants, to persons appointed guardian of the person under 21Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 224-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for children 23who were youth in care for 12 months immediately prior to the 24appointment of the guardian.25    The amount of assistance may vary, depending upon the 26needs of the child and the adoptive parents or subsidized   HB5015- 48 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1guardians, as set forth in the annual assistance agreement. 2Special purpose grants are allowed where the child requires 3special service but such costs may not exceed the amounts 4which similar services would cost the Department if it were to 5provide or secure them as guardian of the child.6    Any financial assistance provided under this subsection is 7inalienable by assignment, sale, execution, attachment, 8garnishment, or any other remedy for recovery or collection of 9a judgment or debt.10    (j-5) The Department shall not deny or delay the placement 11of a child for adoption if an approved family is available 12either outside of the Department region handling the case, or 13outside of the State of Illinois.14    (k) The Department shall accept for care and training any 15child who has been adjudicated neglected or abused, or 16dependent committed to it pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act 17or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.18    (l) The Department shall offer family preservation 19services, as defined in Section 8.2 of the Abused and 20Neglected Child Reporting Act, to help families, including 21adoptive and extended families. Family preservation services 22shall be offered (i) to prevent the placement of children in 23substitute care when the children can be cared for at home or 24in the custody of the person responsible for the children's 25welfare, (ii) to reunite children with their families, or 26(iii) to maintain an adoption or subsidized guardianship.   HB5015- 49 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1Family preservation services shall only be offered when doing 2so will not endanger the children's health or safety. With 3respect to children who are in substitute care pursuant to the 4Juvenile Court Act of 1987, family preservation services shall 5not be offered if a goal other than those of subdivisions (A), 6(B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) of Section 2-28 of that Act 7has been set, except that reunification services may be 8offered as provided in paragraph (F) of subsection (2.3) of 9Section 2-28 of that Act. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 10construed to create a private right of action or claim on the 11part of any individual or child welfare agency, except that 12when a child is the subject of an action under Article II of 13the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and the child's service plan 14calls for services to facilitate achievement of the permanency 15goal, the court hearing the action under Article II of the 16Juvenile Court Act of 1987 may order the Department to provide 17the services set out in the plan, if those services are not 18provided with reasonable promptness and if those services are 19available.20    The Department shall notify the child and the child's 21family of the Department's responsibility to offer and provide 22family preservation services as identified in the service 23plan. The child and the child's family shall be eligible for 24services as soon as the report is determined to be 25"indicated". The Department may offer services to any child or 26family with respect to whom a report of suspected child abuse   HB5015- 50 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1or neglect has been filed, prior to concluding its 2investigation under Section 7.12 of the Abused and Neglected 3Child Reporting Act. However, the child's or family's 4willingness to accept services shall not be considered in the 5investigation. The Department may also provide services to any 6child or family who is the subject of any report of suspected 7child abuse or neglect or may refer such child or family to 8services available from other agencies in the community, even 9if the report is determined to be unfounded, if the conditions 10in the child's or family's home are reasonably likely to 11subject the child or family to future reports of suspected 12child abuse or neglect. Acceptance of such services shall be 13voluntary. The Department may also provide services to any 14child or family after completion of a family assessment, as an 15alternative to an investigation, as provided under the 16"differential response program" provided for in subsection 17(a-5) of Section 7.4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 18Reporting Act.19    The Department may, at its discretion except for those 20children also adjudicated neglected or dependent, accept for 21care and training any child who has been adjudicated addicted, 22as a truant minor in need of supervision or as a minor 23requiring authoritative intervention, under the Juvenile Court 24Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, but no such child shall 25be committed to the Department by any court without the 26approval of the Department. On and after January 1, 2015 (the   HB5015- 51 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1effective date of Public Act 98-803) and before January 1, 22017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 3Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 4adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 5or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 6less than 16 years of age committed to the Department under 7Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 8for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 9exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 10minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 11to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 122-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. On and after January 1, 132017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 14Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 15adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 16or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 17less than 15 years of age committed to the Department under 18Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 19for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 20exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 21minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 22to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 232-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. An independent basis 24exists when the allegations or adjudication of abuse, neglect, 25or dependency do not arise from the same facts, incident, or 26circumstances which give rise to a charge or adjudication of   HB5015- 52 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1delinquency. The Department shall assign a caseworker to 2attend any hearing involving a youth in the care and custody of 3the Department who is placed on aftercare release, including 4hearings involving sanctions for violation of aftercare 5release conditions and aftercare release revocation hearings. 6    As soon as is possible, the Department shall develop and 7implement a special program of family preservation services to 8support intact, relative, foster, and adoptive families who 9are experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 10stress of caring for a child who has been diagnosed with a 11pervasive developmental disorder if the Department determines 12that those services are necessary to ensure the health and 13safety of the child. The Department may offer services to any 14family whether or not a report has been filed under the Abused 15and Neglected Child Reporting Act. The Department may refer 16the child or family to services available from other agencies 17in the community if the conditions in the child's or family's 18home are reasonably likely to subject the child or family to 19future reports of suspected child abuse or neglect. Acceptance 20of these services shall be voluntary. The Department shall 21develop and implement a public information campaign to alert 22health and social service providers and the general public 23about these special family preservation services. The nature 24and scope of the services offered and the number of families 25served under the special program implemented under this 26paragraph shall be determined by the level of funding that the   HB5015- 53 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1Department annually allocates for this purpose. The term 2"pervasive developmental disorder" under this paragraph means 3a neurological condition, including, but not limited to, 4Asperger's Syndrome and autism, as defined in the most recent 5edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 6Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.7    (l-1) The General Assembly recognizes that the best 8interests of the child require that the child be placed in the 9most permanent living arrangement that is an appropriate 10option for the child, consistent with the child's best 11interest, using the factors set forth in subsection (4.05) of 12Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 as soon as is 13practically possible. To achieve this goal, the General 14Assembly directs the Department of Children and Family 15Services to conduct concurrent planning so that permanency may 16occur at the earliest opportunity. Permanent living 17arrangements may include prevention of placement of a child 18outside the home of the family when the child can be cared for 19at home without endangering the child's health or safety; 20reunification with the family, when safe and appropriate, if 21temporary placement is necessary; or movement of the child 22toward the most appropriate living arrangement and legal 23status.24    When determining reasonable efforts to be made with 25respect to a child, as described in this subsection, and in 26making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety   HB5015- 54 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1shall be the paramount concern.2    When a child is placed in foster care, the Department 3shall ensure and document that reasonable efforts were made to 4prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the 5child's home. The Department must make reasonable efforts to 6reunify the family when temporary placement of the child 7occurs unless otherwise required, pursuant to the Juvenile 8Court Act of 1987. At any time after the dispositional hearing 9where the Department believes that further reunification 10services would be ineffective, it may request a finding from 11the court that reasonable efforts are no longer appropriate. 12The Department is not required to provide further 13reunification services after such a finding.14    A decision to place a child in substitute care shall be 15made with considerations of the child's health, safety, and 16best interests. The Department shall make diligent efforts to 17place the child with a relative, document those diligent 18efforts, and document reasons for any failure or inability to 19secure such a relative placement. If the primary issue 20preventing an emergency placement of a child with a relative 21is a lack of resources, including, but not limited to, 22concrete goods, safety modifications, and services, the 23Department shall make diligent efforts to assist the relative 24in obtaining the necessary resources. No later than July 1, 252025, the Department shall adopt rules defining what is 26diligent and necessary in providing supports to potential   HB5015- 55 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1relative placements. At the time of placement, consideration 2should also be given so that if reunification fails or is 3delayed, the placement has the potential to be an appropriate 4permanent placement for the child.5    The Department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent 6planning for reunification and permanency. The Department 7shall consider the following factors when determining 8appropriateness of concurrent planning:9        (1) the likelihood of prompt reunification;10        (2) the past history of the family;11        (3) the barriers to reunification being addressed by 12    the family;13        (4) the level of cooperation of the family;14        (4.5) the child's wishes; 15        (5) the caregivers' willingness to work with the 16    family to reunite;17        (6) the willingness and ability of the caregivers' to 18    provide a permanent placement;19        (7) the age of the child;20        (8) placement of siblings; and21        (9) the wishes of the parent or parents unless the 22    parental preferences are contrary to the best interests of 23    the child. 24    (m) The Department may assume temporary custody of any 25child if:26        (1) it has received a written consent to such   HB5015- 56 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    temporary custody signed by the parents of the child or by 2    the parent having custody of the child if the parents are 3    not living together or by the guardian or custodian of the 4    child if the child is not in the custody of either parent, 5    or6        (2) the child is found in the State and neither a 7    parent, guardian nor custodian of the child can be 8    located.9If the child is found in the child's residence without a 10parent, guardian, custodian, or responsible caretaker, the 11Department may, instead of removing the child and assuming 12temporary custody, place an authorized representative of the 13Department in that residence until such time as a parent, 14guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses a 15willingness and apparent ability to ensure the child's health 16and safety and resume permanent charge of the child, or until a 17relative enters the home and is willing and able to ensure the 18child's health and safety and assume charge of the child until 19a parent, guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses 20such willingness and ability to ensure the child's safety and 21resume permanent charge. After a caretaker has remained in the 22home for a period not to exceed 12 hours, the Department must 23follow those procedures outlined in Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 245-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.25    The Department shall have the authority, responsibilities 26and duties that a legal custodian of the child would have   HB5015- 57 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 2Court Act of 1987. Whenever a child is taken into temporary 3custody pursuant to an investigation under the Abused and 4Neglected Child Reporting Act, or pursuant to a referral and 5acceptance under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of a minor in 6limited custody, the Department, during the period of 7temporary custody and before the child is brought before a 8judicial officer as required by Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 95-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall have the 10authority, responsibilities and duties that a legal custodian 11of the child would have under subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of 12the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.13    The Department shall ensure that any child taken into 14custody is scheduled for an appointment for a medical 15examination.16    A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the 17temporary custody of the Department who would have custody of 18the child if the child were not in the temporary custody of the 19Department may deliver to the Department a signed request that 20the Department surrender the temporary custody of the child. 21The Department may retain temporary custody of the child for 2210 days after the receipt of the request, during which period 23the Department may cause to be filed a petition pursuant to the 24Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If a petition is so filed, the 25Department shall retain temporary custody of the child until 26the court orders otherwise. If a petition is not filed within   HB5015- 58 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1the 10-day period, the child shall be surrendered to the 2custody of the requesting parent, guardian, or custodian not 3later than the expiration of the 10-day period, at which time 4the authority and duties of the Department with respect to the 5temporary custody of the child shall terminate.6    (m-1) The Department may place children under 18 years of 7age in a secure child care facility licensed by the Department 8that cares for children who are in need of secure living 9arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being after a 10determination is made by the facility director and the 11Director or the Director's designate prior to admission to the 12facility subject to Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act 13of 1987. This subsection (m-1) does not apply to a child who is 14subject to placement in a correctional facility operated 15pursuant to Section 3-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, 16unless the child is a youth in care who was placed in the care 17of the Department before being subject to placement in a 18correctional facility and a court of competent jurisdiction 19has ordered placement of the child in a secure care facility.20    (n) The Department may place children under 18 years of 21age in licensed child care facilities when in the opinion of 22the Department, appropriate services aimed at family 23preservation have been unsuccessful and cannot ensure the 24child's health and safety or are unavailable and such 25placement would be for their best interest. Payment for board, 26clothing, care, training and supervision of any child placed   HB5015- 59 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1in a licensed child care facility may be made by the 2Department, by the parents or guardians of the estates of 3those children, or by both the Department and the parents or 4guardians, except that no payments shall be made by the 5Department for any child placed in a licensed child care 6facility for board, clothing, care, training, and supervision 7of such a child that exceed the average per capita cost of 8maintaining and of caring for a child in institutions for 9dependent or neglected children operated by the Department. 10However, such restriction on payments does not apply in cases 11where children require specialized care and treatment for 12problems of severe emotional disturbance, physical disability, 13social adjustment, or any combination thereof and suitable 14facilities for the placement of such children are not 15available at payment rates within the limitations set forth in 16this Section. All reimbursements for services delivered shall 17be absolutely inalienable by assignment, sale, attachment, or 18garnishment or otherwise.19    (n-1) The Department shall provide or authorize child 20welfare services, aimed at assisting minors to achieve 21sustainable self-sufficiency as independent adults, for any 22minor eligible for the reinstatement of wardship pursuant to 23subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 241987, whether or not such reinstatement is sought or allowed, 25provided that the minor consents to such services and has not 26yet attained the age of 21. The Department shall have   HB5015- 60 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1responsibility for the development and delivery of services 2under this Section. An eligible youth may access services 3under this Section through the Department of Children and 4Family Services or by referral from the Department of Human 5Services. Youth participating in services under this Section 6shall cooperate with the assigned case manager in developing 7an agreement identifying the services to be provided and how 8the youth will increase skills to achieve self-sufficiency. A 9homeless shelter is not considered appropriate housing for any 10youth receiving child welfare services under this Section. The 11Department shall continue child welfare services under this 12Section to any eligible minor until the minor becomes 21 years 13of age, no longer consents to participate, or achieves 14self-sufficiency as identified in the minor's service plan. 15The Department of Children and Family Services shall create 16clear, readable notice of the rights of former foster youth to 17child welfare services under this Section and how such 18services may be obtained. The Department of Children and 19Family Services and the Department of Human Services shall 20disseminate this information statewide. The Department shall 21adopt regulations describing services intended to assist 22minors in achieving sustainable self-sufficiency as 23independent adults. 24    (o) The Department shall establish an administrative 25review and appeal process for children and families who 26request or receive child welfare services from the Department.   HB5015- 61 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1Youth in care who are placed by private child welfare 2agencies, and caregivers with whom those youth are placed, 3shall be afforded the same procedural and appeal rights as 4children and families in the case of placement by the 5Department, including the right to an initial review of a 6private agency decision by that agency. The Department shall 7ensure that any private child welfare agency, which accepts 8youth in care for placement, affords those rights to children 9and caregivers with whom those children are placed. The 10Department shall accept for administrative review and an 11appeal hearing a complaint made by (i) a child or caregiver 12with whom the child is placed concerning a decision following 13an initial review by a private child welfare agency or (ii) a 14prospective adoptive parent who alleges a violation of 15subsection (j-5) of this Section. An appeal of a decision 16concerning a change in the placement of a child shall be 17conducted in an expedited manner. A court determination that a 18current placement is necessary and appropriate under Section 192-28 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 does not constitute a 20judicial determination on the merits of an administrative 21appeal, filed by a former caregiver, involving a change of 22placement decision. No later than July 1, 2025, the Department 23shall adopt rules to develop a reconsideration process to 24review: a denial of certification of a relative, a denial of 25placement with a relative, and a denial of visitation with an 26identified relative. Rules shall include standards and   HB5015- 62 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1criteria for reconsideration that incorporate the best 2interests of the child under subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 3of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, address situations where 4multiple relatives seek certification, and provide that all 5rules regarding placement changes shall be followed. The rules 6shall outline the essential elements of each form used in the 7implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this 8amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 9    (p) (Blank).10    (q) The Department may receive and use, in their entirety, 11for the benefit of children any gift, donation, or bequest of 12money or other property which is received on behalf of such 13children, or any financial benefits to which such children are 14or may become entitled while under the jurisdiction or care of 15the Department, except that the benefits described in Section 165.46 must be used and conserved consistent with the provisions 17under Section 5.46.18    The Department shall set up and administer no-cost, 19interest-bearing accounts in appropriate financial 20institutions for children for whom the Department is legally 21responsible and who have been determined eligible for 22Veterans' Benefits, Social Security benefits, assistance 23allotments from the armed forces, court ordered payments, 24parental voluntary payments, Supplemental Security Income, 25Railroad Retirement payments, Black Lung benefits, or other 26miscellaneous payments. Interest earned by each account shall   HB5015- 63 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1be credited to the account, unless disbursed in accordance 2with this subsection.3    In disbursing funds from children's accounts, the 4Department shall:5        (1) Establish standards in accordance with State and 6    federal laws for disbursing money from children's 7    accounts. In all circumstances, the Department's 8    Guardianship Administrator or the Guardianship 9    Administrator's designee must approve disbursements from 10    children's accounts. The Department shall be responsible 11    for keeping complete records of all disbursements for each 12    account for any purpose.13        (2) Calculate on a monthly basis the amounts paid from 14    State funds for the child's board and care, medical care 15    not covered under Medicaid, and social services; and 16    utilize funds from the child's account, as covered by 17    regulation, to reimburse those costs. Monthly, 18    disbursements from all children's accounts, up to 1/12 of 19    $13,000,000, shall be deposited by the Department into the 20    General Revenue Fund and the balance over 1/12 of 21    $13,000,000 into the DCFS Children's Services Fund.22        (3) Maintain any balance remaining after reimbursing 23    for the child's costs of care, as specified in item (2). 24    The balance shall accumulate in accordance with relevant 25    State and federal laws and shall be disbursed to the child 26    or the child's guardian or to the issuing agency.  HB5015- 64 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    (r) The Department shall promulgate regulations 2encouraging all adoption agencies to voluntarily forward to 3the Department or its agent names and addresses of all persons 4who have applied for and have been approved for adoption of a 5hard-to-place child or child with a disability and the names 6of such children who have not been placed for adoption. A list 7of such names and addresses shall be maintained by the 8Department or its agent, and coded lists which maintain the 9confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 10of the child shall be made available, without charge, to every 11adoption agency in the State to assist the agencies in placing 12such children for adoption. The Department may delegate to an 13agent its duty to maintain and make available such lists. The 14Department shall ensure that such agent maintains the 15confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 16of the child.17    (s) The Department of Children and Family Services may 18establish and implement a program to reimburse caregivers 19licensed, certified, or otherwise approved by the Department 20of Children and Family Services for damages sustained by the 21caregivers as a result of the malicious or negligent acts of 22children placed by the Department, as well as providing third 23party coverage for such caregivers with regard to actions of 24children placed by the Department to other individuals. Such 25coverage will be secondary to the caregiver's liability 26insurance policy, if applicable. The program shall be funded   HB5015- 65 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1through appropriations from the General Revenue Fund, 2specifically designated for such purposes.3    (t) The Department shall perform home studies and 4investigations and shall exercise supervision over visitation 5as ordered by a court pursuant to the Illinois Marriage and 6Dissolution of Marriage Act or the Adoption Act only if:7        (1) an order entered by an Illinois court specifically 8    directs the Department to perform such services; and9        (2) the court has ordered one or both of the parties to 10    the proceeding to reimburse the Department for its 11    reasonable costs for providing such services in accordance 12    with Department rules, or has determined that neither 13    party is financially able to pay.14    The Department shall provide written notification to the 15court of the specific arrangements for supervised visitation 16and projected monthly costs within 60 days of the court order. 17The Department shall send to the court information related to 18the costs incurred except in cases where the court has 19determined the parties are financially unable to pay. The 20court may order additional periodic reports as appropriate.21    (u) In addition to other information that must be 22provided, whenever the Department places a child with a 23prospective adoptive parent or parents, in a licensed foster 24home, group home, or child care institution, in a relative 25home, or in a certified relative caregiver home, the 26Department shall provide to the caregiver, appropriate   HB5015- 66 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or parents:2        (1) available detailed information concerning the 3    child's educational and health history, copies of 4    immunization records (including insurance and medical card 5    information), a history of the child's previous 6    placements, if any, and reasons for placement changes 7    excluding any information that identifies or reveals the 8    location of any previous caregiver or adoptive parents;9        (2) a copy of the child's portion of the client 10    service plan, including any visitation arrangement, and 11    all amendments or revisions to it as related to the child; 12    and13        (3) information containing details of the child's 14    individualized education program educational plan when the 15    child is receiving special education services.16    The caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective 17adoptive parent or parents, shall be informed of any known 18social or behavioral information (including, but not limited 19to, criminal background, fire setting, perpetuation of sexual 20abuse, destructive behavior, and substance abuse) necessary to 21care for and safeguard the children to be placed or currently 22in the home or setting. The Department may prepare a written 23summary of the information required by this paragraph, which 24may be provided to the caregiver, appropriate facility staff, 25or prospective adoptive parent in advance of a placement. The 26caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive   HB5015- 67 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1parent may review the supporting documents in the child's file 2in the presence of casework staff. In the case of an emergency 3placement, casework staff shall at least provide known 4information verbally, if necessary, and must subsequently 5provide the information in writing as required by this 6subsection. 7    The information described in this subsection shall be 8provided in writing. In the case of emergency placements when 9time does not allow prior review, preparation, and collection 10of written information, the Department shall provide such 11information as it becomes available. Within 10 business days 12after placement, the Department shall obtain from the 13caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive 14parent or parents a signed verification of receipt of the 15information provided. Within 10 business days after placement, 16the Department shall provide to the child's guardian ad litem 17a copy of the information provided to the caregiver, 18appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or 19parents. The information provided to the caregiver, 20appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or 21parents shall be reviewed and approved regarding accuracy at 22the supervisory level. 23    (u-5) Beginning July 1, 2025, certified relative caregiver 24homes under Section 3.4 of the Child Care Act of 1969 shall be 25eligible to receive foster care maintenance payments from the 26Department in an amount no less than payments made to licensed   HB5015- 68 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1foster family homes. Beginning July 1, 2025, relative homes 2providing care to a child placed by the Department that are not 3a certified relative caregiver home under Section 3.4 of the 4Child Care Act of 1969 or a licensed foster family home shall 5be eligible to receive payments from the Department in an 6amount no less 90% of the payments made to licensed foster 7family homes and certified relative caregiver homes.8    (u-6) To assist relative and certified relative 9caregivers, no later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall 10adopt rules to implement a relative support program, as 11follows: 12        (1) For relative and certified relative caregivers, 13    the Department is authorized to reimburse or prepay 14    reasonable expenditures to remedy home conditions 15    necessary to fulfill the home safety-related requirements 16    of relative caregiver homes. 17        (2) The Department may provide short-term emergency 18    funds to relative and certified relative caregiver homes 19    experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 20    stress associated with adding youth in care as new 21    household members. 22        (3) Consistent with federal law, the Department shall 23    include in any State Plan made in accordance with the 24    Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Titles 25    IV-E and XIX of the Social Security Act, and any other 26    applicable federal laws the provision of kinship navigator   HB5015- 69 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    program services. The Department shall apply for and 2    administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with 3    law. Federal funds acquired for the kinship navigator 4    program shall be used for the development, implementation, 5    and operation of kinship navigator program services. The 6    kinship navigator program services may provide 7    information, referral services, support, and assistance to 8    relative and certified relative caregivers of youth in 9    care to address their unique needs and challenges. Until 10    the Department is approved to receive federal funds for 11    these purposes, the Department shall publicly post on the 12    Department's website semi-annual updates regarding the 13    Department's progress in pursuing federal funding. 14    Whenever the Department publicly posts these updates on 15    its website, the Department shall notify the General 16    Assembly through the General Assembly's designee. 17    (u-7) To support finding permanency for children through 18subsidized guardianship and adoption and to prevent disruption 19in guardianship and adoptive placements, the Department shall 20establish and maintain accessible subsidized guardianship and 21adoption support services for all children under 18 years of 22age placed in guardianship or adoption who, immediately 23preceding the guardianship or adoption, were in the custody or 24guardianship of the Department under Article II of the 25Juvenile Court Act of 1987.26    The Department shall establish and maintain a toll-free   HB5015- 70 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1number to respond to requests from the public about its 2subsidized guardianship and adoption support services under 3this subsection and shall staff the toll-free number so that 4calls are answered on a timely basis, but in no event more than 5one business day after the receipt of a request. These 6requests from the public may be made anonymously. To meet this 7obligation, the Department may utilize the same toll-free 8number the Department operates to respond to post-adoption 9requests under subsection (b-5) of Section 18.9 of the 10Adoption Act. The Department shall publicize information about 11the Department's subsidized guardianship support services and 12toll-free number as follows:13        (1) it shall post information on the Department's 14    website;15        (2) it shall provide the information to every licensed 16    child welfare agency and any entity providing subsidized 17    guardianship support services in Illinois courts;18        (3) it shall reference such information in the 19    materials the Department provides to caregivers pursuing 20    subsidized guardianship to inform them of their rights and 21    responsibilities under the Child Care Act of 1969 and this 22    Act;23        (4) it shall provide the information, including the 24    Department's Post Adoption and Guardianship Services 25    booklet, to eligible caregivers as part of its 26    guardianship training and at the time they are presented   HB5015- 71 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    with the Permanency Commitment form;2        (5) it shall include, in each annual notification 3    letter mailed to subsidized guardians, a short, 2-sided 4    flier or news bulletin in plain language that describes 5    access to post-guardianship services, how to access 6    services under the Family Support Program, formerly known 7    as the Individual Care Grant Program, the webpage address 8    to the Post Adoption and Guardianship Services booklet, 9    information on how to request that a copy of the booklet be 10    mailed; and11        (6) it shall ensure that kinship navigator programs of 12    this State, when established, have this information to 13    include in materials the programs provide to caregivers.14    No later than July 1, 2026, the Department shall provide a 15mechanism for the public to make information requests by 16electronic means. 17    The Department shall review and update annually all 18information relating to its subsidized guardianship support 19services, including its Post Adoption and Guardianship 20Services booklet, to include updated information on Family 21Support Program services eligibility and subsidized 22guardianship support services that are available through the 23medical assistance program established under Article V of the 24Illinois Public Aid Code or any other State program for mental 25health services. The Department and the Department of 26Healthcare and Family Services shall coordinate their efforts   HB5015- 72 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1in the development of these resources.2    Every licensed child welfare agency and any entity 3providing kinship navigator programs funded by the Department 4shall provide the Department's website address and link to the 5Department's subsidized guardianship support services 6information set forth in subsection (d), including the 7Department's toll-free number, to every relative who is or 8will be providing guardianship placement for a child placed by 9the Department.10    (v) The Department shall access criminal history record 11information as defined in the Illinois Uniform Conviction 12Information Act and information maintained in the adjudicatory 13and dispositional record system as defined in Section 2605-355 14of the Illinois State Police Law if the Department determines 15the information is necessary to perform its duties under the 16Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, the Child Care Act 17of 1969, and the Children and Family Services Act. The 18Department shall provide for interactive computerized 19communication and processing equipment that permits direct 20online on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's 21central criminal history data repository. The Department shall 22comply with all certification requirements and provide 23certified operators who have been trained by personnel from 24the Illinois State Police. In addition, one Office of the 25Inspector General investigator shall have training in the use 26of the criminal history information access system and have   HB5015- 73 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1access to the terminal. The Department of Children and Family 2Services and its employees shall abide by rules and 3regulations established by the Illinois State Police relating 4to the access and dissemination of this information.5    (v-1) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 6with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall conduct 7a criminal records background check of the prospective foster 8or adoptive parent, including fingerprint-based checks of 9national crime information databases. Final approval for 10placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals a 11felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for spousal 12abuse, for a crime against children, or for a crime involving 13violence, including human trafficking, sex trafficking, rape, 14sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical 15assault or battery, or if there is a felony conviction for 16physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense committed 17within the past 5 years.18    (v-2) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 19with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall check 20its child abuse and neglect registry for information 21concerning prospective foster and adoptive parents, and any 22adult living in the home. If any prospective foster or 23adoptive parent or other adult living in the home has resided 24in another state in the preceding 5 years, the Department 25shall request a check of that other state's child abuse and 26neglect registry.   HB5015- 74 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    (v-3) Prior to the final approval of final placement of a 2related child in a certified relative caregiver home as 3defined in Section 2.37 of the Child Care Act of 1969, the 4Department shall ensure that the background screening meets 5the standards required under subsection (c) of Section 3.4 of 6the Child Care Act of 1969. 7    (v-4) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 8with a relative, as defined in Section 4d of this Act, who is 9not a licensed foster parent, has declined to seek approval to 10be a certified relative caregiver, or was denied approval as a 11certified relative caregiver, the Department shall: 12        (i) check the child abuse and neglect registry for 13    information concerning the prospective relative caregiver 14    and any other adult living in the home. If any prospective 15    relative caregiver or other adult living in the home has 16    resided in another state in the preceding 5 years, the 17    Department shall request a check of that other state's 18    child abuse and neglect registry; and 19        (ii) conduct a criminal records background check of 20    the prospective relative caregiver and all other adults 21    living in the home, including fingerprint-based checks of 22    national crime information databases. Final approval for 23    placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals 24    a felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for 25    spousal abuse, for a crime against children, or for a 26    crime involving violence, including human trafficking, sex   HB5015- 75 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    trafficking, rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not 2    including other physical assault or battery, or if there 3    is a felony conviction for physical assault, battery, or a 4    drug-related offense committed within the past 5 years; 5    provided however, that the Department is empowered to 6    grant a waiver as the Department may provide by rule, and 7    the Department approves the request for the waiver based 8    on a comprehensive evaluation of the caregiver and 9    household members and the conditions relating to the 10    safety of the placement.11    No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt 12rules or revise existing rules to effectuate the changes made 13to this subsection (v-4). The rules shall outline the 14essential elements of each form used in the implementation and 15enforcement of the provisions of this amendatory Act of the 16103rd General Assembly. 17    (w) (Blank).18    (x) The Department shall conduct annual credit history 19checks to determine the financial history of children placed 20under its guardianship pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 211987. The Department shall conduct such credit checks starting 22when a youth in care turns 12 years old and each year 23thereafter for the duration of the guardianship as terminated 24pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Department 25shall determine if financial exploitation of the child's 26personal information has occurred. If financial exploitation   HB5015- 76 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1appears to have taken place or is presently ongoing, the 2Department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency, the 3proper State's Attorney, or the Attorney General.4    (y) Beginning on July 22, 2010 (the effective date of 5Public Act 96-1189), a child with a disability who receives 6residential and educational services from the Department shall 7be eligible to receive transition services in accordance with 8Article 14 of the School Code from the age of 14.5 through age 921, inclusive, notwithstanding the child's residential 10services arrangement. For purposes of this subsection, "child 11with a disability" means a child with a disability as defined 12by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 13Improvement Act of 2004. 14    (z) The Department shall access criminal history record 15information as defined as "background information" in this 16subsection and criminal history record information as defined 17in the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act for each 18Department employee or Department applicant. Each Department 19employee or Department applicant shall submit the employee's 20or applicant's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in 21the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 22These fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint 23records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police 24and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 25records databases. In accordance with this Section, each 26Department employee or Department applicant shall self-report   HB5015- 77 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1to the Department within 30 days of incurring any subsequent 2criminal history record information while employed or in 3anticipation of being employed at the Department, along with 4completing a self-certification form each year that there have 5been no updates to the employee's or applicant's criminal 6history record, on a form to be prescribed by the Department. 7The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for conducting 8the criminal history record check, which shall be deposited 9into the State Police Services Fund and shall not exceed the 10actual cost of the record check. The Illinois State Police 11shall furnish, pursuant to positive identification, all 12Illinois conviction information to the Department of Children 13and Family Services. 14    For purposes of this subsection: 15    "Background information" means all of the following: 16        (i) Upon the request of the Department of Children and 17    Family Services, conviction information obtained from the 18    Illinois State Police as a result of a fingerprint-based 19    criminal history records check of the Illinois criminal 20    history records database and the Federal Bureau of 21    Investigation criminal history records database concerning 22    a Department employee or Department applicant. 23        (ii) Information obtained by the Department of 24    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 25    the Illinois State Police's Sex Offender Database, as 26    authorized by Section 120 of the Sex Offender Community   HB5015- 78 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    Notification Law, concerning a Department employee or 2    Department applicant. 3        (iii) Information obtained by the Department of 4    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 5    the Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 6    operated and maintained by the Department. 7    "Department employee" means a full-time or temporary 8employee coded or certified within the State of Illinois 9Personnel System. 10    "Department applicant" means an individual who has 11conditional Department full-time or part-time work, a 12contractor, an individual used to replace or supplement staff, 13an academic intern, a volunteer in Department offices or on 14Department contracts, a work-study student, an individual or 15entity licensed by the Department, or an unlicensed service 16provider who works as a condition of a contract or an agreement 17and whose work may bring the unlicensed service provider into 18contact with Department clients or client records. 19    (aa) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 20104-165 this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are 21declarative of existing law and are not a new enactment. 22(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-50, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, eff. 247-1-25; 104-107, eff. 7-1-26; 104-165, eff. 8-15-25; revised 259-11-25.)   HB5015- 79 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1    Section 10. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 2changing Section 4.1 as follows: 3    (225 ILCS 10/4.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2214.1)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)5    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations.6    (a) In this Section, "third-party vendor" means a 7third-party fingerprinting vendor who is licensed by the 8Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and 9regulated by 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1240.600.10    (b) The Department shall require that each child care 11facility license applicant as part of the application process, 12and each employee and volunteer of a child care facility or 13non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 14authorize an investigation to determine if such applicant, 15employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 16if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 17shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 18may be contacted. An employee or volunteer of a day care 19center, day care home, or group day care home shall authorize 20an investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child 21Care and Development Block Grant. A child care facility, 22non-licensed service provider, day care center, group day care 23home, or day care home may authorize the Department or a 24third-party vendor to collect fingerprints for the 25investigation. If a third-party vendor is used for   HB5015- 80 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1fingerprinting, then the child care facility, non-licensed 2service provider, day care center, group day care home, or day 3care home shall pay the third-party vendor for that service 4directly. If a child care facility, non-licensed service 5provider, day care center, group day care home, or day care 6home authorizes the Department or a third-party vendor to 7collect fingerprints for the investigation, the Director shall 8request and receive information and assistance from any 9federal, State, or local governmental agency as part of the 10authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or 11volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 12provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 13volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 14form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 15fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 16now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 17Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 18databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 19conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 20deposited into in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 21exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 22State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 23charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 24against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 25facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 26Department of Children and Family Services when the request is   HB5015- 81 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1made in the form and manner required by the Illinois State 2Police.3    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 4employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 5non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 6including the source of the information and any conclusions or 7recommendations derived from the information, shall be 8provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 9volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 10provider prior to final action by the Department on the 11application. State conviction information provided by the 12Illinois State Police regarding employees, prospective 13employees, or volunteers of non-licensed service providers and 14child care facilities licensed under this Act shall be 15provided to the operator of such facility, and, upon request, 16to the employee, prospective employee, or volunteer of a child 17care facility or non-licensed service provider. Any 18information concerning criminal charges and the disposition of 19such charges obtained by the Department shall be confidential 20and may not be transmitted outside the Department, except as 21required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone within 22the Department except as needed for the purpose of evaluating 23an application or an employee or volunteer of a child care 24facility or non-licensed service provider. Only information 25and standards which bear a reasonable and rational relation to 26the performance of a child care facility shall be used by the   HB5015- 82 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1Department or any licensee. Any employee of the Department of 2Children and Family Services, Illinois State Police, or a 3child care facility receiving confidential information under 4this Section who gives or causes to be given any confidential 5information concerning any criminal convictions of an 6applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 7non-licensed service provider, shall be guilty of a Class A 8misdemeanor unless release of such information is authorized 9by this Section.10    The Department of Children and Family Services, through 11June 30, 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on and 12after July 1, 2026, shall allow day care centers, day care 13homes, and group day care homes to hire, on a probationary 14basis, any employee or volunteer authorizing a criminal 15background investigation under this Section after receiving a 16qualifying result, as determined by the Department of Children 17and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, 18whichever is applicable, pursuant to this Act, from either: 19        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 20    criminal background check; or21        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 22    background check and a criminal record check of the 23    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 24    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.25    Pending full clearance of all background check 26requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be   HB5015- 83 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1supervised at all times by an individual who received a 2qualifying result on all background check components. 3Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home, 4or group day care home shall be notified prior to hiring that 5such employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal 6background information obtained by the facility.7(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-1072, eff. 1-1-26; 8104-307, eff. 1-1-26; revised 10-27-25.) 9    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)10    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. 11    (a) In this Section: , "third-party vendor"12        "Employee" means any staff person employed at a child 13    care facility or non-licensed service provider, including 14    any unlicensed contractual employee, substitute, or 15    assistant and other support staff who have access to 16    children. 17        "Third-party vendor" means a third-party 18    fingerprinting vendor who is licensed by the Department of 19    Financial and Professional Regulation and regulated by 68 20    Ill. Adm. Code 1240.600.21    (b) The Department of Children and Family Services or the 22Department of Early Childhood shall require that each child 23care facility license applicant under the agencies' respective 24authority as part of the application process, and each 25employee and volunteer of a child care facility or   HB5015- 84 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 2authorize an investigation to determine if such applicant, 3employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 4if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 5shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 6may be contacted. An employee or volunteer of a day care 7center, day care home, or group day care home shall authorize 8an investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child 9Care and Development Block Grant. A child care facility, 10non-licensed service provider, day care center, group day care 11home, or day care home may authorize the Department of 12Children and Family Services, the Department of Early 13Childhood, or a third-party vendor to collect fingerprints for 14the investigation. If a third-party vendor is used for 15fingerprinting, then the child care facility, non-licensed 16service provider, day care center, group day care home, or day 17care home shall pay the third-party vendor for that service 18directly. If a child care facility, non-licensed service 19provider, day care center, group day care home, or day care 20home authorizes the Department of Children and Family 21Services, the Department of Early Childhood, or a third-party 22vendor to collect fingerprints for the investigation, the 23Director of Children and Family Services or the Secretary of 24Early Childhood shall request and receive information and 25assistance from any federal, State, or local governmental 26agency as part of the authorized investigation. Each   HB5015- 85 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 2non-licensed service provider shall submit the applicant's, 3employee's, or volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State 4Police in the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State 5Police. These fingerprints shall be checked against the 6fingerprint records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois 7State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal 8history records databases. In accordance with this Section, 9each employee or volunteer of a child care facility or 10non-licensed service provider under the authority of the 11Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 12of Early Childhood shall self-report to the appropriate 13Department within 30 days of incurring any subsequent criminal 14history record information while employed or in anticipation 15of being employed at that child care facility or non-licensed 16service provider, along with completing a self-certification 17form each year that there have been no updates to the 18employee's or volunteer's criminal history record, on a form 19to be prescribed by the appropriate Department. The Illinois 20State Police shall charge a fee for conducting the criminal 21history records check, which shall be deposited into in the 22State Police Services Fund and shall not exceed the actual 23cost of the records check. The Illinois State Police shall 24provide information concerning any criminal charges, and their 25disposition, now or hereafter filed, against an applicant, 26employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or   HB5015- 86 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1non-licensed service provider upon request of the Department 2of Children and Family Services or the Department of Early 3Childhood when the request is made in the form and manner 4required by the Illinois State Police.5    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 6employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 7non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 8including the source of the information and any conclusions or 9recommendations derived from the information, shall be 10provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 11volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 12provider prior to final action by the Department of Children 13and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood under 14the agencies' respective authority on the application. State 15conviction information provided by the Illinois State Police 16regarding employees, prospective employees, or volunteers of 17non-licensed service providers and child care facilities 18licensed under this Act shall be provided to the operator of 19such facility, and, upon request, to the employee, prospective 20employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 21non-licensed service provider. Any information concerning 22criminal charges and the disposition of such charges obtained 23by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 24Department of Early Childhood shall be confidential and may 25not be transmitted outside the Department of Children and 26Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, except   HB5015- 87 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1as required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone 2within the Department of Children and Family Services or the 3Department of Early Childhood except as needed for the purpose 4of evaluating an application or an employee or volunteer of a 5child care facility or non-licensed service provider. Only 6information and standards which bear a reasonable and rational 7relation to the performance of a child care facility shall be 8used by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 9Department of Early Childhood or any licensee. Any employee of 10the Department of Children and Family Services, Department of 11Early Childhood, Illinois State Police, or a child care 12facility receiving confidential information under this Section 13who gives or causes to be given any confidential information 14concerning any criminal convictions of an applicant, employee, 15or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 16provider, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless 17release of such information is authorized by this Section.18    The Department of Children and Family Services, through 19June 30, 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on and 20after July 1, 2026, shall allow day care centers, day care 21homes, and group day care homes to hire, on a probationary 22basis, any employee or volunteer authorizing a criminal 23background investigation under this Section after receiving a 24qualifying result, as determined by the Department of Children 25and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, 26whichever is applicable, pursuant to this Act, from either:   HB5015- 88 -LRB104 19221 KTG 32666 b1        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 2    criminal background check; or3        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 4    background check and a criminal record check of the 5    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 6    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.7    Pending full clearance of all background check 8requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be 9supervised at all times by an individual who received a 10qualifying result on all background check components. 11Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home, 12or group day care home shall be notified prior to hiring that 13such employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal 14background information obtained by the facility.15(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 16103-1072, eff. 1-1-26; 104-307, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1710-27-25.) 18    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 19changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 20that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 21represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 22not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 23made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 24Public Act.